Utah statutes.
32B-9-201.   Application requirements for event permit.

(1)  To obtain an event permit, a person shall submit to the department:

(a)  a written application in a form that the department prescribes;

(b)  an event permit fee:

(i)  in the amount specified in the relevant part under this chapter for the type of event permit for which the person is applying; and

(ii)  that is refundable if an event permit is not issued;

(c)  written consent of the local authority;

(d)  a bond as specified by Section 32B-9-203;

(e)  the times, dates, location, estimated attendance, nature, and purpose of the event;

(f)  a description or floor plan designating:

(i)  the area in which the person proposes that an alcoholic product be stored;

(ii)  the site from which the person proposes that an alcoholic product be sold, offered for sale, or furnished; and

(iii)  the area in which the person proposes that an alcoholic product be allowed to be consumed;

(g)  a signed consent form stating that the event permittee will permit any authorized representative of the commission, department, or any law enforcement officer to have unrestricted right to enter the premises during the event;

(h)  if the person is an entity, proper verification evidencing that a person who signs the application is authorized to sign on behalf of the entity; and

(i)  any other information as the commission or department may require.

(2)  An entity applying for a permit need not meet the requirements of Subsections (1)(b), (c), and (d) if the entity is:

(a)  a state agency; or

(b)  a political subdivision of the state.

(3)  The director may not issue an event permit to a person who is disqualified under Section 32B-1-304.

(4) (a)  The proximity requirements of Section 32B-1-202 do not apply to an event permit.

(b)  Notwithstanding Subsection (4)(a), nothing in this section prevents the director, the Compliance, Licensing, and Enforcement Subcommittee, or the commission from considering the proximity of an educational, religious, or recreational facility, or any other relevant factor in deciding whether to issue an event permit.

